North Dakota statutes. TITLE 57 Taxation
CHAPTER 57-39.2 Sales Tax
57-39.2-21.
General powers.

The commissioner, for the purpose of ascertaining the correctness of any return or for the purpose of making an estimate of the taxable income and receipts of any taxpayer, has power to examine or cause to be examined by any agent or representative designated by the commissioner books, papers, records, or memoranda; to require by subpoena the attendance and testimony of witnesses; to issue and sign subpoenas; to administer oaths; to examine witnesses and receive evidence; and to compel witnesses to produce for examination books, papers, records, and documents relating to any matter which the commissioner has the authority to investigate or determine.

If the commissioner finds the taxpayer has made a fraudulent return, the costs of said hearing must be taxed to the taxpayer. In all other cases the cost must be paid by the state.

The fees and mileage to be paid witnesses and taxed as costs must be the same as prescribed by law in proceedings in the district court of this state in civil cases. All costs must be taxed in the manner provided by law in proceedings in civil cases. When the costs are taxed to the taxpayer, they must be added to the taxes assessed against said taxpayer and must be collected in the same manner. Costs taxed to the state must be certified by the commissioner to the state treasurer, who shall issue warrants for the amount of said costs.

In cases of disobedience to a subpoena, the commissioner may invoke the aid of any court of competent jurisdiction in requiring the attendance and testimony of witnesses and production of records, books, papers, and documents, and such court may issue an order requiring the person to appear before the commissioner and give evidence or produce records, books, papers, and documents, as the case may be, and any failure to obey such order of court may be punished by the court as contempt thereof.

Testimony on hearings before the commissioner may be taken by a deposition as in civil cases, and any person may be compelled to appear and depose in the same manner as witnesses may be compelled to appear and testify as hereinbefore provided.

Source:

S.L. 1967, ch. 459, § 20.

57-39.2-22.
Commissioner may appoint agents and employees — Compensation — Bond.

The commissioner may appoint such agents, auditors, clerks, and employees as the commissioner deems necessary, fix their salaries and compensation and prescribe their duties and powers, and may remove such persons so appointed. Each auditor appointed by the commissioner must have had at least three years’ experience, or the education equivalent thereof, in the auditing and checking of books of account.

All such agents and employees must be allowed such reasonable and other necessary traveling expenses as may be incurred in the performance of their duties not to exceed, however, such amounts as are now or may hereafter be fixed by law.

The commissioner may require such of the officers, agents, and employees as the commissioner designates to give bond for the faithful performance of the duties in such sum and such sureties as the commissioner determines and the state shall pay the premiums on such bonds.

The commissioner may utilize the office of the treasurer of the various counties in order to administer this chapter and effectuate its purposes and may appoint the treasurers of the various counties as the commissioner’s agents to collect any or all of the taxes imposed by this chapter. No additional compensation may be paid to said treasurer by reason thereof.

Source:

S.L. 1967, ch. 459, § 21.

57-39.2-23.
Information deemed confidential — Certain releases of information authorized.

Except as provided by law:

The commissioner or an individual having an administrative duty under this chapter may not divulge or make known in any manner whatever the business affairs, operations, or information obtained from any person under any reporting requirement of this chapter, or by an investigation of any person in the discharge of official duty, or the amount or sources of income, profits, losses, expenditures, or any particulars set forth or disclosed in any return, or permit any return or copy or any book containing any abstract of particulars to be seen or examined by any individual.

A court of competent jurisdiction may issue an order or subpoena directing the tax commissioner to disclose state tax return information to a local, state, or federal law enforcement official conducting a criminal investigation if the court determines that the facts submitted by the applicant satisfy the following:

There is probable cause to believe that a specific criminal act has been committed and that the return or return information constitutes evidence of a criminal offense or may be relevant to a matter relating to the commission of the criminal offense;

The return or return information is sought exclusively for use in a criminal investigation or proceeding concerning such act; and

The information sought to be disclosed cannot reasonably be obtained under the circumstances, from another source.

Before obtaining an order under this subsection, a law enforcement official may request information from the tax commissioner as to whether a taxpayer, which is the subject of a criminal investigation for which a return or return information is or may be relevant to the commission of a criminal offense, has complied with the requirements of this chapter. For purposes of this request, the tax commissioner is limited to stating that the taxpayer has or has not complied with these requirements.

Except as required during court proceedings, tax return information disclosed to law enforcement under this section remains confidential during an active criminal investigation, after the investigation, after prosecution concludes, or until the time period for appeals has expired, whichever is later.

The commissioner may authorize examination of those returns by other state officers and at the commissioner’s discretion furnish to the tax officials of other states, the multistate tax commission, and the United States any information contained in the tax returns and reports and related schedules and documents filed under this chapter, and in the related report of an audit or investigation, if the information is furnished solely for tax purposes. The multistate tax commission may make the information available to the tax officials of any other state and the United States for tax purposes.

The commissioner may furnish to workforce safety and insurance, the job insurance division of job service North Dakota, and the secretary of state, upon request of the respective agency, a list or lists of holders of permits issued under this chapter or chapter 57-40.2, together with the addresses and tax department file identification numbers of those permitholders. The agency may use the list or lists only for the purpose of administering the duties of the agency. The commissioner may furnish to the unclaimed property division of the board of university and school lands, upon its request, the name, address, and the permitholder’s federal identification number for the sole purpose of identifying the owner of an unclaimed voucher authorized by the commissioner.

The commissioner may furnish to a state agency or private entity a list of names and addresses of holders of permits issued under this chapter or chapter 57-40.2 for the purpose of jointly publishing or distributing publications or other information under section 54-06-04.3. Any information provided may only be used for the purpose of jointly publishing or distributing publications or other information as provided in section 54-06-04.3.

The commissioner may make information pertaining to county lodging taxes, county lodging and restaurant taxes, city lodging taxes, city lodging and restaurant taxes, or city or county sales and use taxes, contained in tax returns, reports, related schedules and documents, and reports of an audit or investigation available upon request to no more than two duly elected or appointed members of the governing body of a city or county for which collection and administration of the tax is required by statute or a tax collection agreement administered under section 57-01-02.1. The governing body of the city or county or its members may not divulge or make known in any manner the business affairs, operations, or other information acquired from the commissioner under this subsection concerning any person, corporation, limited liability company, or other entity unless the disclosure is by judicial order and for tax administration purposes only.

The commissioner or any person having an administrative duty under this chapter may announce that a permit has been revoked.

The tax commissioner, upon written request from the director of the North Dakota lottery, may provide a written statement to the director, employees, or agents of the North Dakota lottery, in which the tax commissioner is limited to stating that the lottery retailer applicant has complied or not complied with the requirements of this chapter. The information obtained under this subsection is confidential and may be used for the sole purpose of determining whether the applicant meets the requirements of subsections 3, 4, and 5 of section 53-12.1-07.

Upon request, the commissioner may furnish to the unclaimed property division of the board of university and school lands, a taxpayer’s name, address, and federal identification number for identifying the owner of an unclaimed voucher authorized by the commissioner or to locate the apparent owner of unclaimed property as provided under chapter 47-30.2.

The commissioner may provide the department of commerce information obtained through the administration of the sales tax under this chapter or the use tax under chapter 57-40.2. A request by the department of commerce for information must be in writing and must be limited to information necessary to evaluate the degree of success and compliance with statutory or contractual performance standards established for employers who received economic development assistance from this state. A request under this subsection does not require the commissioner to compile or create a record, including compiling or creating a record that does not exist from electronically stored information. Information received by the department of commerce under this subsection is not subject to section 44-04-18 and section 6 of article XI of the Constitution of North Dakota and may not be disclosed by the department of commerce except in an aggregate format that does not allow the identification of a taxpayer and does not contain any information in the returns or reports filed by a taxpayer.

Source:

S.L. 1967, ch. 459, § 22; 1969, ch. 516, § 3; 1971, ch. 536, § 5; 1973, ch. 480, § 4; 1975, ch. 106, § 611; 1985, ch. 82, § 149; 1991, ch. 99, §§ 3, 4; 1991, ch. 568, § 5; 1993, ch. 54, § 106; 2001, ch. 531, § 2; 2001, ch. 540, § 2; 2003, ch. 454, § 7; 2003, ch. 561, § 3; 2005, ch. 470, § 8; 2007, ch. 531, § 2; 2009, ch. 554, § 2; 2013, ch. 454, § 3; 2015, ch. 354, § 3, effective August 1, 2015; 2021, ch. 457, § 4, effective July 1, 2021; 2021, ch. 337, § 20, effective July 1, 2021; 2021, ch. 457, § 4, effective July 1, 2021.

Note.

Section 57-39.2-23 was amended 2 times by the 2021 Legislative Assembly. Pursuant to Section 1-02-09.1, the section is printed above to harmonize and give effect to the changes made in Section 4 of Chapter 457, Session Laws 2021, House Bill 1099; and Section 20 of Chapter 337, Session Laws 2021, Senate Bill 2048.

Cross-References.

Contract with collection agency for collection of delinquent taxes, see N.D.C.C. § 57-01-13.

57-39.2-24.
Correction of errors. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1967, ch. 459, § 23; 1973, ch. 480, § 5; repealed by 2017, ch. 409, § 9, effective July 1, 2017.

57-39.2-24.1.
Claim for refund.

A taxpayer may file a claim for refund of tax that was not due, or for which a refund is authorized under this chapter or chapter 57-40.2. A refund claim must be filed in the manner provided in this section.

A taxpayer shall file a claim for refund with the tax commissioner within three years after the due date of the return or the date the return was filed, whichever is later.

For purposes of this section, “taxpayer” means a person who is required under this chapter or chapter 57-40.2 to file a return and who has remitted to the tax commissioner the tax for which a refund is claimed.

Source:

S.L. 2017, ch. 409, § 5, effective July 1, 2017.

57-39.2-25.
Payment of refund.

Whenever by any provisions of this chapter a refund is authorized, the commissioner shall certify the amount of the refund, the reason therefor, and the name of the payee to the office of management and budget, who shall thereupon draw a warrant on the general fund in the amount specified payable to the named payee. Interest of ten percent per annum must be allowed and paid upon any overpayment of tax from sixty days after the due date of the return or after the date the return was filed or after the date the tax due was fully paid, whichever comes later, to the date of the refund.

If the tax commissioner disallows a claim for credit or refund, the tax commissioner shall notify the taxpayer accordingly. The decision of the tax commissioner to deny a claim is final and irrevocable thirty days after the date of notice unless within the thirty-day period the taxpayer files a written protest. A written protest must be filed under rules adopted by the tax commissioner under chapter 28-32.

Source:

S.L. 1967, ch. 459, § 24; 1979, ch. 611, § 3; 1991, ch. 648, § 9.

57-39.2-26.
Allocation of revenue.

Except as provided by sections 57-39.2-26.1 and 57-39.2-26.2, all moneys collected and received under this chapter must be paid into the state treasury and must be credited by the state treasurer to the general fund. Moneys deposited with the commissioner as security for the payment of tax, penalties, or costs due must be deposited and accounted for as provided in subsection 3 of section 57-39.2-12.

Source:

S.L. 1967, ch. 459, § 25; 2005, ch. 578, § 2.

57-39.2-26.1.
State aid distribution fund — State treasurer — Continuing appropriation.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, a portion of sales, gross receipts, use, and motor vehicle excise tax collections, equal to forty-three and one-half percent of an amount determined by multiplying the quotient of one percent divided by the general sales tax rate, that was in effect when the taxes were collected, times the net sales, gross receipts, use, and motor vehicle excise tax collections under chapters 57-39.2, 57-39.5, 57-39.6, 57-40.2, and 57-40.3 must be deposited by the state treasurer in the state aid distribution fund. The state tax commissioner shall certify to the state treasurer the portion of sales, gross receipts, use, and motor vehicle excise tax net revenues that must be deposited in the state aid distribution fund as determined under this section. Revenues deposited in the state aid distribution fund are appropriated to the state treasurer on a continuing basis and must be allocated monthly as follows:

Fifty-three and seven-tenths percent of the revenues must be allocated to counties as provided in this subsection.

Sixty-four percent of the amount must be allocated among the seventeen counties with the greatest population, in the following manner:

Thirty-two percent of the amount must be allocated equally among the counties; and

The remaining amount must be allocated based upon the proportion each such county’s population bears to the total population of all such counties.

Thirty-six percent of the amount must be allocated among all counties, excluding the seventeen counties with the greatest population, in the following manner:

Forty percent of the amount must be allocated equally among the counties; and

The remaining amount must be allocated based upon the proportion each such county’s population bears to the total population of all such counties.

Forty-six and three-tenths percent of the revenues must be allocated to cities based upon the proportion each city’s population bears to the total population of all cities.

The state treasurer, for the purpose of making revenue allocations to counties and cities for each month of the fiscal year under this section, shall determine the population of counties and cities before the first day of the fiscal year using the most recent actual or estimated census data published by the United States census bureau.

A county shall deposit all revenues received under this subsection in the county general fund. Each county shall reserve a portion of its allocation under this subsection for further distribution to, or expenditure on behalf of, townships, rural fire protection districts, rural ambulance districts, soil conservation districts, county recreation service districts, county hospital districts, the Garrison Diversion Conservancy District, the southwest water authority, and other taxing districts within the county, excluding school districts, cities, and taxing districts within cities. The share of the county allocation under this subsection to be distributed to a township must be equal to the percentage of the county share of state aid distribution fund allocations that township received during calendar year 1996. The governing boards of the county and township may agree to a different distribution.

A city shall deposit all revenues received under this subsection in the city general fund. Each city shall reserve a portion of its allocation under this subsection for further distribution to, or expenditure on behalf of, park districts and other taxing districts within the city, excluding school districts. The share of the city allocation under this subsection to be distributed to a park district must be equal to the percentage of the city share of state aid distribution fund allocations that park district received during calendar year 1996, up to a maximum of thirty percent. The governing boards of the city and park district may agree to a different distribution.

Source:

S.L. 1987, ch. 35, § 1; 1991, ch. 28, § 37; 1997, ch. 19, § 2; 1997, ch. 496, § 3; 2001, ch. 535, § 4; 2001, ch. 541, § 1; 2003, ch. 537, § 1; 2005, ch. 15, § 40; 2005, ch. 580, § 9; 2011, ch. 472, § 1; 2013, ch. 449, § 16; 2015, ch. 455, § 1, effective April 22, 2015; 2021 [HB1379], § 1, effective for net sales, gross receipts, use, and motor vehicle excise tax collections deposited in the state aid distribution fund after June 30, 2021.

Note.

Section 2 of chapter 455, S.L. 2015 provides,

“EFFECTIVE DATE — EXPIRATION DATE.

This Act is effective for tax collections received by the tax commissioner after June 30, 2015, and before July 1, 2021, and is thereafter ineffective.”

57-39.2-26.2.
Allocation of revenues to senior citizen services and programs matching fund — Continuing appropriation.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, a portion of sales, use, and motor vehicle excise tax collections equal to the amount of revenue that would have been generated by a levy of eighty-seven and one-half percent of one mill on the taxable valuation of all property in the state subject to a levy under section 57-15-56 in the previous taxable year must be deposited by the state treasurer in the senior citizen services and programs fund during the period from July first through December thirty-first of each year. The state tax commissioner shall certify to the state treasurer the portion of sales, use, and motor vehicle excise tax revenues which must be deposited in the fund as determined under this section. Revenues deposited in the senior citizen services and programs fund are provided as a standing and continuing appropriation for allocation as provided in subsection 5 of section 57-15-56. Any unexpended and unobligated amount in the senior citizen services and programs fund at the end of any biennium must be transferred by the state treasurer to the state general fund.

Source:

S.L. 2005, ch. 578, § 3; 2011, ch. 453, § 2; 2013, ch. 448, § 2; 2015, ch. 441, § 2, effective July 1, 2015.

57-39.2-26.3.
County aid distribution fund — State treasurer — Continuing appropriation.

There is created in the state treasury the county aid distribution fund. The fund consists of all moneys transferred to the fund under subsection 2. All moneys in the fund are appropriated to the state treasurer on a continuing basis for the purpose of providing allocations to an eligible county.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, a portion of sales, gross receipts, use, and motor vehicle excise tax collections, equal to one-fourth of one percent of an amount determined by multiplying the quotient of one percent divided by the general sales tax rate, that was in effect when the taxes were collected, times the net sales, gross receipts, use, and motor vehicle excise tax collections under chapters 57-39.2, 57-39.5, 57-39.6, 57-40.2, and 57-40.3 must be deposited by the state treasurer in the county aid distribution fund. The tax commissioner shall certify to the state treasurer the portion of sales, gross receipts, use, and motor vehicle excise tax net revenues that must be deposited in the county aid distribution fund as determined under this subsection.

At least quarterly, the state treasurer shall allocate the moneys in the fund to the county with the lowest ratio of taxable property values per capita and a population of more than ten thousand.

The county treasurer shall deposit all revenues received under this section in the county general fund.

For purposes of determining taxable property values under this section, the state treasurer shall use the most recent data published by the tax commissioner in the tax levy report.

For purposes of determining the county’s population under this section, the state treasurer shall use the most recent actual or estimated census data published by the United States census bureau.

Source:

S.L. 2021, ch. 476, § 1, effective July 1, 2021.

Note.

Section 2 of chapter 476, S.L. 2021, provides, “

APPLICATION.

This Act applies to net sales, gross receipts, use, and motor vehicle excise tax collections received by the tax commissioner after June 30, 2021.”

57-39.2-27.
Disposition of excess tax collections.

Whenever a retailer has collected a sales tax from a customer in excess of the amount prescribed or due under this chapter, and if the retailer does not refund the excessive tax collected to the customer, the amount so collected by the retailer must be paid by the retailer to the tax commissioner in the return filed for the period in which the excessive collection occurred. If the excessive collection is subsequently refunded by the retailer to the customer, the retailer may file an amended return with the tax commissioner for the period the excess tax was collected and file a claim for refund.

Source:

S.L. 1969, ch. 527, § 1; 2017, ch. 409, § 6, effective July 1, 2017.

57-39.2-28.
Refunds for Canadian residents.

The tax imposed under this chapter on gross receipts from sales made to a person who is a resident of Canada may be refunded under the following conditions:

The Canadian resident was in North Dakota for the express purpose of making a purchase, and not as a tourist.

The goods will be removed from North Dakota within thirty days of purchase and will be used permanently outside North Dakota.

The Canadian resident applies in writing to the commissioner on a form as the commissioner may prescribe reciting sufficient facts establishing the exempt status of the sale.

The qualifying sale is one in which the total gross receipts from each individual transaction, which may involve one or more items, equals twenty-five dollars or more.

The refund is fifteen dollars or more. Qualifying sales may be accumulated for periods not in excess of one calendar year in order to reach the fifteen dollar limit.

Notwithstanding section 57-39.2-23, the commissioner may provide names and addresses of Canadian residents claiming a North Dakota sales tax refund to the director of the department of commerce division of tourism.

Source:

S.L. 1989, ch. 717, § 2; 1991, ch. 640, § 37; 1993, ch. 80, § 36; 2001, ch. 488, § 57.

57-39.2-29.
Sourcing — Multiple points of use exemption. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2007, ch. 528, § 24.

57-39.2-30.
Conditional sales contract.

For purposes of the tax imposed by this chapter, on any sale made under a conditional sales contract or under other forms of sale in which the payment of the principal sum is extended over a period longer than sixty days from the date of sale, only the portion of the sale amount that has actually been received in cash by the retailer during each reporting period is subject to the tax imposed by this chapter during that reporting period.

Source:

S.L. 2003, ch. 539, § 16; 2005, ch. 582, § 2.

57-39.2-31.
Seller and certified service provider limited immunity.

A seller or certified service provider is immune from civil liability for charging and collecting the incorrect amount of sales or use tax in reliance on incorrect information provided by the tax commissioner regarding tax rates, boundaries, or taxing jurisdiction assignments. The tax commissioner will not be required to provide liability relief for errors resulting from the reliance on an address-based system for assigning tax jurisdictions as provided under the agreement adopted under chapter 57-39.4.

Source:

S.L. 2003, ch. 539, § 17; 2005, ch. 582, § 2.

57-39.2-32.
Confidentiality of information obtained by certified service providers.

A certified service provider or any agent, employee, or other person acting under the authority of a certified service provider may not divulge or make known in any manner whatsoever the business affairs, operations, or information obtained by the certified service provider in the discharge of its duties under this chapter.

Source:

S.L. 2003, ch. 539, § 18; 2005, ch. 582, § 2.